Indiana, session 2026, HB1080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-10-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 3. Family Reunification Programs
Sec. 1. For purposes of this chapter, "family reunification
program" refers to any camp, workshop, therapeutic vacation, or
educational program that is designed to reunite a parent with the
parent's child.
Sec. 2. The department shall not recommend a family
reunification program that requires as a condition of enrollment
or participation any of the following:
(1) A no contact order.
(2) Any:
(A) overnight;
(B) out-of-state; or
(C) multi-day;
stay.
2026 IN 1080—LS 6392/DI 148


(3) A transfer of legal custody or physical custody.
(4) The use of a private youth transporter or a private
transportation agent engaged in:
(A) the use of force;
(B) the threat of force;
(C) physical obstruction;
(D) acutely distressing circumstances; or
(E) circumstances that place the child's safety at risk.
(5) The:
(A) threat of physical force;
(B) use of undue coercion;
(C) use of verbal abuse; or
(D) isolation of a child from the child's family, community,
or other sources of support.
Sec. 3. A court shall not order a family reunification program
that as a condition of enrollment or participation requires any of
the following:
(1) A no contact order.
(2) Any:
(A) overnight;
(B) out-of-state; or
(C) multi-day;
stay.
(3) A transfer of legal custody or physical custody.
(4) The use of a private youth transporter or a private
transportation agent engaged in:
(A) the use of force;
(B) the threat of force;
(C) physical obstruction;
(D) acutely distressing circumstances; or
(E) circumstances that place the child's safety at risk.
(5) The:
(A) threat of physical force;
(B) use of undue coercion;
(C) use of verbal abuse; or
(D) isolation of a child from the child's family, community,
or other sources of support.
Sec. 4. Beginning January 1, 2027, an individual who presides
over a family law or juvenile law matter shall attend the judicial
training program under IC 33-24-6-16 at least one (1) time each
calendar year.
SECTION 2. IC 33-24-6-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 1080—LS 6392/DI 148


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The office of judicial administration shall
establish a judicial training program for an individual who
presides over family law or juvenile law matters.
(b) The office of judicial administration shall provide the
judicial training program described in subsection (a) at least one
(1) time each calendar year. The judicial training program must
include the following aspects of domestic violence:
(1) Child sexual abuse.
(2) Emotional abuse.
(3) Coercive control.
(4) Implicit and explicit bias related to parties involved in
domestic violence cases.
(5) Trauma.
(6) Long term and short term effects of domestic violence.
(7) The detriment to children of residing with a person who
perpetrates domestic violence.
(8) That domestic violence can occur without:
(A) a party seeking or obtaining a protective order;
(B) a substantiated child services finding; or
(C) other documented evidence of abuse.
(9) Victim and perpetrator behavioral patterns and
relationship dynamics within the cycle of violence.
2026 IN 1080—LS 6392/DI 148